Florida, session 2026, HB933.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsection (14) of section 409.147,
Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (16) and
amended, and new subsections (14) and (15) are added to that
section, to read:
409.147 Florida Children's Initiatives.—
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb933-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 933 2026
(14) THE BAY COUNTY 32401 CHILDREN'S INITIATIVE.—
(a) There is created within Bay County a project called
the Bay County 32401 Children's Initiative managed by an entity
organized as a not-for-profit corporation registered,
incorporated, organized, and operated in compliance with chapter
617 and this section. Public policy dictates that the Bay County
32401 Children's Initiative operate in the most open and
accessible manner consistent with its public purpose. Therefore,
the Legislature declares that the Bay County 32401 Children's
Initiative is subject to chapter 119, relating to public
records; chapter 286, relating to public meetings and records;
and chapter 287, relating to the procurement of commodities or
contractual services.
(b) This initiative is designed to encompass an area that
is large enough to include all of the necessary components of
community life, including, but not limited to, schools, places
of worship, recreational facilities, commercial areas, and
common spaces, yet small enough to allow programs and services
to reach every member of the neighborhood who is willing to
participate in the project.
(15) POMPANO RYZE CHILDREN'S INITIATIVE.—
(a) There is created within Broward County a project
called the Pompano RYZE (Resilient Youth with Zeal to Excel)
Children's Initiative managed by an entity organized as a not-
for-profit corporation registered, incorporated, organized, and
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb933-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 933 2026
operated in compliance with chapter 617 and this section. Public
policy dictates that the Pompano RYZE Children's Initiative
operate in the most open and accessible manner consistent with
its public purpose. Therefore, the Legislature declares that the
Pompano RYZE Children's Initiative is subject to chapter 119,
relating to public records; chapter 286, relating to public
meetings and records; and chapter 287, relating to the
procurement of commodities or contractual services.
(b) This initiative is designed to encompass an area that
is large enough to include all of the necessary components of
community life, including, but not limited to, schools, places
of worship, recreational facilities, commercial areas, and
common spaces, yet small enough to allow programs and services
to reach every member of the neighborhood who is willing to
participate in the project.
(16)(14) IMPLEMENTATION.—
(a) The Miami Children's Initiative, Inc., the New Town
Success Zone, the Orlando Kidz Zones, the Tampa SSNOP, and the
Overtown Children and Youth Coalition, the Bay County 32401
Children's Initiative, and the Pompano RYZE Children's
Initiative have been designated as Florida Children's
Initiatives consistent with the legislative intent and purpose
of s. 16, chapter 2009-43, Laws of Florida, and as such shall
each assist the disadvantaged areas of this state in creating a
community-based service network and programming that develops,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb933-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 933 2026
coordinates, and provides quality education, accessible health
care, youth development programs, opportunities for employment,
and safe and affordable housing for children and families living
within their boundaries.
(b) To implement this section for the Florida Children's
Initiatives listed in this section, the department shall
contract with a not-for-profit corporation, to work in
collaboration with the governing body to adopt the resolution
described in subsection (4), to establish the planning team as
provided in subsection (5), and to develop and adopt the
strategic community plan as provided in subsection (6). The not-
for-profit corporation is also responsible for the development
of a strategic business plan and for the evaluation, fiscal
management, and oversight of the Florida Children's Initiatives.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb933-00